Massachusetts, session 194th, H4748.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
(a). Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the licensing
authority of the Town of Bridgewater may grant an additional license for the sale of all alcoholic
beverages not to be drunk on premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to KOTAK
LLC, located at the premises known as 223 Broad Street, in the town of Bridgewater and under
conditions set by, the licensing authority of the Town of Bridgewater. The license granted under
this section shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17.
(b) The licensing authority shall restrict the license authorized pursuant to this section to
the premises located at 233 Broad Street, Bridgewater, Massachusetts, 02324.
of 2

(c) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to
any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same location if the
applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter
from the department of unemployment assistance indicating the license in in good standing with
those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been paid.
(d) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew the license granted pursuant to this section or
any such license is cancelled, revoked, or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with
all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority
which may, within 3 years of such return, grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location and under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license shall
dissolve.
(e) The license granted pursuant to this section shall be issues within 2 years after the
effective date of this act; provided, however, that license that is originally granted with that time
period may be granted to a new applicant pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) thereafter.
(f) The issuance of the license granted pursuant to this section shall be contingent upon
KOTAK LLC turning in their existing license for the sale of wine and malt beverages not to be
drunk on premise pursuant to section 15 to the Town of Bridgewater.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2